Utah statutes.
41-1a-401.   License plates -- Number of plates -- Reflectorization --
Indicia of registration in lieu of or used with plates.
(1) (a)  The division upon registering a vehicle shall issue to the owner one
license plate for a motorcycle, trailer, or semitrailer and two identical
license plates for every other vehicle.
(b)  The license plate shall be issued  for the particular vehicle registered
and may not be removed during the term for which the license plate is issued
or used upon any other vehicle than the registered vehicle.
(2)  The division may receive applications for registration renewal, renew
registration, and issue new license plates or decals at any time prior to the
expiration of registration.
(3) (a)  All license plates to be manufactured and issued by the division
shall be treated with a fully reflective material on the plate face that
provides effective and dependable reflective brightness during the service
period of the license plate.
(b)  The division shall prescribe all license plate material specifications
and establish and implement procedures for conforming to the specifications.
(c)  The specifications for the materials used such as the aluminum plate
substrate, the reflective sheeting, and glue shall be drawn in a manner so
that at least two manufacturers may qualify as suppliers.
(d)  The granting of contracts for the materials shall be by public bid.
(4) (a)  The commission may issue, adopt, and require the use of indicia of
registration it considers advisable in lieu of or in conjunction with license
plates as provided in this part.
(b)  All provisions of this part relative to license plates apply to these
indicia of registration, so far as the provisions are applicable.
